Georgia, session 2025_26, HB561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Okefenokee Protection Act."
SECTION 2.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The Okefenokee Swamp is a vital part of Georgia with more than local significance,
is of equal importance to all citizens of the state, is of state-wide concern, and
consequently is properly a matter for regulation and protection under the authority of the
H. B. 561
- 1 -

LC 44 3003
State of Georgia to ensure the values and functions of the Okefenokee Swamp, including
its status as a popular and historic tourist attraction, are not impaired and to fulfill the
responsibilities of each generation as public trustees of the Okefenokee Swamp for
succeeding generations; and
(2) Trail Ridge is a key element in the formation and continued existence of the
Okefenokee Swamp. It shapes the hydrology of the area and controls drainage of the
swamp to the Atlantic Ocean. Trail Ridge contains heavy mineral sands, resulting in two
major surface mining proposals in the past 25 years. The people of Georgia as well as
state and national leaders overwhelmingly rejected the first proposal. Surface mining on
Trail Ridge risks adverse impacts to the wetlands, water quality and quantity, wildlife
habitat, air quality, and wilderness values of the Okefenokee Swamp. As a danger to the
future of the Okefenokee Swamp, Trail Ridge mining impacts the cultural heritage of
indigenous peoples of the area, as well as the historic heritage of the people and
communities whose existence has been shaped by the swamp.
SECTION 3.
Part 3 of Article 2 of Chapter 4 of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to surface mining, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"12-4-85.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'Trail Ridge' means that elevated, geological
feature bounded on the west by the Okefenokee Swamp and its watershed; on the east by
an elevation of 100 feet above mean sea level; on the south by the triple divide of the
Soldiers Camp Island, Boone Creek, and Barbar Branch watersheds; and on the north by
the triple divide of the Upper Buffalo Creek, Big Creek, and Okefenokee Swamp
watersheds.
H. B. 561
- 2 -

LC 44 3003
(b) The director of the division shall not issue, modify, or renew any permit or accept any
bond to conduct surface mining operations on Trail Ridge for any permit application or
permit amendment submitted on or after July 1, 2025."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 561
- 3 -